Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-3530
Seal and signature; affixation; restrictions.

A professional geologist shall affix such professional geologist's seal and signature on geologic reports, documents, maps, plans, logs, and sections, or other public records offered to the public and prepared while in responsible charge or under the direct supervision of the professional geologist.

Laws 1998, LB 1161, § 89;

Laws 2013, LB91, § 5;

Laws 2025, LB38, § 25.